Utah statutes.
34A-1-103.   Labor Commission -- Creation -- Seal.
(1)  There is created the Labor Commission, that has all of the policymaking
functions, regulatory and enforcement powers, rights, duties, and
responsibilities outlined in:
(a)  this title; and
(b)  unless otherwise specified, Title 34, Labor in General.
(2)  The commission may sue and be sued.
(3) (a)  The commission shall have an official seal for the authentication of
its orders.  A description and impression of the seal shall be filed with the
Division of Archives.
(b)  A court in this state shall take judicial notice of the seal of the
commission.
